Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.aff
FLAG long
SFX c5 écher èchera/n'q'm't's' écher is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 écrer ècrera/n'q'm't's' écrer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 éder èdera/n'q'm't's' éder is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 éger ègera/n'q'm't's' éger is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 égler èglera/n'q'm't's' égler is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 égner ègnera/n'q'm't's' égner is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 égrer ègrera/n'q'm't's' égrer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 éguer èguera/n'q'm't's' éguer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 éler èlera/n'q'm't's' éler is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 émer èmera/n'q'm't's' émer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 éner ènera/n'q'm't's' éner is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 éper èpera/n'q'm't's' éper is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 équer èquera/n'q'm't's' équer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 érer èrera/n'q'm't's' érer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 éser èsera/n'q'm't's' éser is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 éter ètera/n'q'm't's' éter is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 étrer ètrera/n'q'm't's' étrer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 évrer èvrera/n'q'm't's' évrer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 éyer èyera/n'q'm't's' éyer is:ifut is:3sg
SFX c5 er erons/n't' er is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerons/n't' ébrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 écer ècerons/n't' écer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 écher ècherons/n't' écher is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 écrer ècrerons/n't' écrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 éder èderons/n't' éder is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 éger ègerons/n't' éger is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 égler èglerons/n't' égler is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 égner ègnerons/n't' égner is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 égrer ègrerons/n't' égrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 éguer èguerons/n't' éguer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 éler èlerons/n't' éler is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 émer èmerons/n't' émer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 éner ènerons/n't' éner is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 éper èperons/n't' éper is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 équer èquerons/n't' équer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 érer èrerons/n't' érer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 éser èserons/n't' éser is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 éter èterons/n't' éter is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 étrer ètrerons/n't' étrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 évrer èvrerons/n't' évrer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 éyer èyerons/n't' éyer is:ifut is:1pl
SFX c5 er erez/n'm' er is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerez/n'm' ébrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 écer ècerez/n'm' écer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 écher ècherez/n'm' écher is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 écrer ècrerez/n'm' écrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 éder èderez/n'm' éder is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 éger ègerez/n'm' éger is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 égler èglerez/n'm' égler is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 égner ègnerez/n'm' égner is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 égrer ègrerez/n'm' égrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 éguer èguerez/n'm' éguer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 éler èlerez/n'm' éler is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 émer èmerez/n'm' émer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 éner ènerez/n'm' éner is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 éper èperez/n'm' éper is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 équer èquerez/n'm' équer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 érer èrerez/n'm' érer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 éser èserez/n'm' éser is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 éter èterez/n'm' éter is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 étrer ètrerez/n'm' étrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 évrer èvrerez/n'm' évrer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 éyer èyerez/n'm' éyer is:ifut is:2pl
SFX c5 er eront/n'q'm't's' er is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 ébrer èbreront/n'q'm't's' ébrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 écer èceront/n'q'm't's' écer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 écher ècheront/n'q'm't's' écher is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 écrer ècreront/n'q'm't's' écrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 éder èderont/n'q'm't's' éder is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 éger ègeront/n'q'm't's' éger is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 égler ègleront/n'q'm't's' égler is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 égner ègneront/n'q'm't's' égner is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 égrer ègreront/n'q'm't's' égrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 éguer ègueront/n'q'm't's' éguer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 éler èleront/n'q'm't's' éler is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 émer èmeront/n'q'm't's' émer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 éner èneront/n'q'm't's' éner is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 éper èperont/n'q'm't's' éper is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 équer èqueront/n'q'm't's' équer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 érer èreront/n'q'm't's' érer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 éser èseront/n'q'm't's' éser is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 éter èteront/n'q'm't's' éter is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 étrer ètreront/n'q'm't's' étrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 évrer èvreront/n'q'm't's' évrer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 éyer èyeront/n'q'm't's' éyer is:ifut is:3pl
SFX c5 er erais/n'j'm't' er is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerais/n'j'm't' ébrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 écer ècerais/n'j'm't' écer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 écher ècherais/n'j'm't' écher is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 écrer ècrerais/n'j'm't' écrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 éder èderais/n'j'm't' éder is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 éger ègerais/n'j'm't' éger is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 égler èglerais/n'j'm't' égler is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 égner ègnerais/n'j'm't' égner is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 égrer ègrerais/n'j'm't' égrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 éguer èguerais/n'j'm't' éguer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 éler èlerais/n'j'm't' éler is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 émer èmerais/n'j'm't' émer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 éner ènerais/n'j'm't' éner is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 éper èperais/n'j'm't' éper is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 équer èquerais/n'j'm't' équer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 érer èrerais/n'j'm't' érer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 éser èserais/n'j'm't' éser is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 éter èterais/n'j'm't' éter is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 étrer ètrerais/n'j'm't' étrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 évrer èvrerais/n'j'm't' évrer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 éyer èyerais/n'j'm't' éyer is:cond is:1sg
SFX c5 er erais/n'm't' er is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerais/n'm't' ébrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 écer ècerais/n'm't' écer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 écher ècherais/n'm't' écher is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 écrer ècrerais/n'm't' écrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 éder èderais/n'm't' éder is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 éger ègerais/n'm't' éger is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 égler èglerais/n'm't' égler is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 égner ègnerais/n'm't' égner is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 égrer ègrerais/n'm't' égrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 éguer èguerais/n'm't' éguer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 éler èlerais/n'm't' éler is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 émer èmerais/n'm't' émer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 éner ènerais/n'm't' éner is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 éper èperais/n'm't' éper is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 équer èquerais/n'm't' équer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 érer èrerais/n'm't' érer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 éser èserais/n'm't' éser is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 éter èterais/n'm't' éter is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 étrer ètrerais/n'm't' étrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 évrer èvrerais/n'm't' évrer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 éyer èyerais/n'm't' éyer is:cond is:2sg
SFX c5 er erait/n'q'm't's' er is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerait/n'q'm't's' ébrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 écer ècerait/n'q'm't's' écer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 écher ècherait/n'q'm't's' écher is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 écrer ècrerait/n'q'm't's' écrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 éder èderait/n'q'm't's' éder is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 éger ègerait/n'q'm't's' éger is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 égler èglerait/n'q'm't's' égler is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 égner ègnerait/n'q'm't's' égner is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 égrer ègrerait/n'q'm't's' égrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 éguer èguerait/n'q'm't's' éguer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 éler èlerait/n'q'm't's' éler is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 émer èmerait/n'q'm't's' émer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 éner ènerait/n'q'm't's' éner is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 éper èperait/n'q'm't's' éper is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 équer èquerait/n'q'm't's' équer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 érer èrerait/n'q'm't's' érer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 éser èserait/n'q'm't's' éser is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 éter èterait/n'q'm't's' éter is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 étrer ètrerait/n'q'm't's' étrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 évrer èvrerait/n'q'm't's' évrer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 éyer èyerait/n'q'm't's' éyer is:cond is:3sg
SFX c5 er erions/n't' er is:cond is:1pl
SFX c5 ébrer èbrerions/n't' ébrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c5 écer ècerions/n't' écer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c5 écher ècherions/n't' écher is:cond is:1pl
SFX c5 écrer ècrerions/n't' écrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c5 éder èderions/n't' éder is:cond is:1pl
SFX c5 éger ègerions/n't' éger is:cond is:1pl
SFX c5 égler èglerions/n't' égler is:cond is:1pl
SFX c5 égner ègnerions/n't' égner is:cond is:1pl
SFX c5 égrer ègrerions/n't' égrer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c5 éguer èguerions/n't' éguer is:cond is:1pl
SFX c5 éler èlerions/n't' éler is:cond is:1pl
